Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.130

Expense of liquidation.

All expenses incurred by the director in taking possession, administering and winding up any such corporation, including the expenses of assistants and reasonable fees for any attorney who may be employed in connection therewith, and the reasonable compensation of any special assistant placed in charge of such corporation shall be a first charge upon the assets thereof. Such charges shall be fixed by the director, subject to the approval of the court.

[ 1994 c 92 s 117; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.130. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 64; 1915 c 98 s 5; RRS s 3271. Formerly RCW 30.44.130.]